src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kuoqd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kuoʼd: # Noun 85 'eng /est kodu/fin' - full paradigm
     kuoʼd+N+Sg+Nom: [kuoʼd, kuod]
     kuoʼd+N+Sg+Gen: [kuoʼd, kuod]
     kuoʼd+N+Sg+Par: kuotā
     kuoʼd+N+Sg+Dat: [kuoʼddõn, kuoddõn]
     kuoʼd+N+Sg+Ins: [kuoʼdkõks, kuodkõks]
     kuoʼd+N+Sg+Ill: [kuoʼddõ, kuoddõ]
     kuoʼd+N+Sg+Ela: [kuoʼdstõ, kuodstõ]
     kuoʼd+N+Pl+Nom: kuodūd
     kuoʼd+N+Pl+Gen: kuodūd
     kuoʼd+N+Pl+Par: kuodīdi
     kuoʼd+N+Pl+Dat: kuodūdõn
     kuoʼd+N+Pl+Ins: kuodūdõks
     kuoʼd+N+Pl+Ill: kuodīž
     kuoʼd+N+Pl+Ela: kuodīst
